Utah statutes.
45-3-4.   Cause of action for abuse -- Remedies.
An individual whose personal identity has been abused under Section 45-3-3 of
this act may bring an action against a person who caused the publication of
the advertisement, and is entitled to injunctive relief, damages alleged and
proved, exemplary damages, and reasonable attorney's fees and costs.
